District of Columbia statutes.
46-355.05

Penalties for noncompliance.

An employer that willfully fails to comply with an income-withholding order issued in another state and received for enforcement is subject to the same penalties that may be imposed for noncompliance with an order issued by a tribunal of the District.

Feb. 27, 2016, D.C. Law 21-73, § 505, 63 DCR 222